Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.060

Educational programs for residential school residents—Department of social and health services and department of children, youth, and families to give notice when need for reduction of staff—Liability upon failure.

The department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall provide written notice on or before April 15th of each school year to the superintendent of each school district conducting a program of education pursuant to this chapter of any foreseeable residential school closure, reduction in the number of residents, or any other cause for a reduction in the school district's staff for the next school year. In the event the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families fail to provide notice as prescribed by this section, the departments shall be liable and responsible for the payment of the salary and employment related costs for the next school year of each school district employee whose contract the school district would have nonrenewed but for the failure of the departments to provide notice.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 724; 2014 c 157 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 175; 1979 ex.s. c 217 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.778.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 217: See note following RCW 28A.190.030.